test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NA_VINIT_ishkodewidaabaan_gt-norm.yaml
     #Isolation form
     ishkodewidaabaan: ishkodewidaabaan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1
     +Px1ishkodewidaabaan: niishkodewidaabaan
     +Px2ishkodewidaabaan: giishkodewidaabaan
     +Px3ishkodewidaabaan: oishkodewidaabaan
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan: iishkodewidaabaan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim: ishkodewidaabaanens
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con: ishkodewidaabaanenh
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3
     ishkodewidaabaan+Pos: ishkodewidaabaanim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4
     ishkodewidaabaan+Pej: ishkodewidaabaanish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 5
     ishkodewidaabaan+Pos1Pl: ishkodewidaabaaninaan
     ishkodewidaabaan+PosPl: ishkodewidaabaaniwaa
     ishkodewidaabaan+PosObv: ishkodewidaabaanini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6
     ishkodewidaabaan+Pret: ishkodewidaabaaniban
     ishkodewidaabaan+VocPl: ishkodewidaabaan***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 7
     ishkodewidaabaan+Obv: ishkodewidaabaanan
     ishkodewidaabaan+Pl: ishkodewidaabaanag
     ishkodewidaabaan+Loc: ishkodewidaabaaning
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2
     +Px1ishkodewidaabaan+Dim: niishkodewidaabaanens
     +Px1ishkodewidaabaan+Con: niishkodewidaabaanenh
     +Px2ishkodewidaabaan+Dim: giishkodewidaabaanens
     +Px2ishkodewidaabaan+Con: giishkodewidaabaanenh
     +Px3ishkodewidaabaan+Dim: oishkodewidaabaanens
     +Px3ishkodewidaabaan+Con: oishkodewidaabaanenh
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+Dim: iishkodewidaabaanens
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+Con: iishkodewidaabaanenh
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3
     +Px1ishkodewidaabaan+Pos: niishkodewidaabaanim
     +Px2ishkodewidaabaan+Pos: giishkodewidaabaanim
     +Px3ishkodewidaabaan+Pos: oishkodewidaabaanim
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+Pos: iishkodewidaabaanim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4
     +Px1ishkodewidaabaan+Pej: niishkodewidaabaanish
     +Px2ishkodewidaabaan+Pej: giishkodewidaabaanish
     +Px3ishkodewidaabaan+Pej: oishkodewidaabaanish
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+Pej: iishkodewidaabaanish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5
     +Px1ishkodewidaabaan+Pos1Pl: niishkodewidaabaaninaan
     +Px1ishkodewidaabaan+PosPl: niishkodewidaabaaniwaa
     +Px1ishkodewidaabaan+PosObv: niishkodewidaabaanini
     +Px2ishkodewidaabaan+Pos1Pl: giishkodewidaabaaninaan
     +Px2ishkodewidaabaan+PosPl: giishkodewidaabaaniwaa
     +Px2ishkodewidaabaan+PosObv: giishkodewidaabaanini
     +Px3ishkodewidaabaan+Pos1Pl: oishkodewidaabaaninaan
     +Px3ishkodewidaabaan+PosPl: oishkodewidaabaaniwaa
     +Px3ishkodewidaabaan+PosObv: oishkodewidaabaanini
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+Pos1Pl: iishkodewidaabaaninaan
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+PosPl: iishkodewidaabaaniwaa
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+PosObv: iishkodewidaabaanini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 6
     +Px1ishkodewidaabaan+Pret: niishkodewidaabaaniban
     +Px1ishkodewidaabaan+VocPl: niishkodewidaabaan***idig, idog***
     +Px2ishkodewidaabaan+Pret: giishkodewidaabaaniban
     +Px2ishkodewidaabaan+VocPl: giishkodewidaabaan***idig, idog***
     +Px3ishkodewidaabaan+Pret: oishkodewidaabaaniban
     +Px3ishkodewidaabaan+VocPl: oishkodewidaabaan***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+Pret: iishkodewidaabaaniban
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+VocPl: iishkodewidaabaan***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 7
     +Px1ishkodewidaabaan+Obv: niishkodewidaabaanan
     +Px1ishkodewidaabaan+Pl: niishkodewidaabaanag
     +Px1ishkodewidaabaan+Loc: niishkodewidaabaaning
     +Px2ishkodewidaabaan+Obv: giishkodewidaabaanan
     +Px2ishkodewidaabaan+Pl: giishkodewidaabaanag
     +Px2ishkodewidaabaan+Loc: giishkodewidaabaaning
     +Px3ishkodewidaabaan+Obv: oishkodewidaabaanan
     +Px3ishkodewidaabaan+Pl: oishkodewidaabaanag
     +Px3ishkodewidaabaan+Loc: oishkodewidaabaaning
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+Obv: iishkodewidaabaanan
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+Pl: iishkodewidaabaanag
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+Loc: iishkodewidaabaaning
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos: ishkodewidaabaanensim
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos: ishkodewidaabaanenhim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pej: ishkodewidaabaanensish
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pej: ishkodewidaabaanenhish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 5
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos1Pl: ishkodewidaabaanensinaan
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+PosPl: ishkodewidaabaanensiwaa
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+PosObv: ishkodewidaabaanensini
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos1Pl: ishkodewidaabaanenhinaan
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+PosPl: ishkodewidaabaanenhiwaa
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+PosObv: ishkodewidaabaanenhini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 6
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pret: ishkodewidaabaanensiban
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+VocPl: ishkodewidaabaanens***idig, idog***
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pret: ishkodewidaabaanenhiban
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+VocPl: ishkodewidaabaanenh***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 7
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Obv: ishkodewidaabaanensan
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pl: ishkodewidaabaanensag
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Loc: ishkodewidaabaanensing
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Obv: ishkodewidaabaanenhan
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pl: ishkodewidaabaanenhag
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Loc: ishkodewidaabaanenhing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4
     ishkodewidaabaan+Pos+Pej: ishkodewidaabaanimish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 5
     ishkodewidaabaan+Pos+Pos1Pl: ishkodewidaabaaniminaan
     ishkodewidaabaan+Pos+PosPl: ishkodewidaabaanimiwaa
     ishkodewidaabaan+Pos+PosObv: ishkodewidaabaanimini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 6
     ishkodewidaabaan+Pos+Pret: ishkodewidaabaanimiban
     ishkodewidaabaan+Pos+VocPl: ishkodewidaabaanim***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 7
     ishkodewidaabaan+Pos+Obv: ishkodewidaabaaniman
     ishkodewidaabaan+Pos+Pl: ishkodewidaabaanimag
     ishkodewidaabaan+Pos+Loc: ishkodewidaabaaniming
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 5
     ishkodewidaabaan+Pej+Pos1Pl: ishkodewidaabaanishinaan
     ishkodewidaabaan+Pej+PosPl: ishkodewidaabaanishiwaa
     ishkodewidaabaan+Pej+PosObv: ishkodewidaabaanishini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 6
     ishkodewidaabaan+Pej+Pret: ishkodewidaabaanishiban
     ishkodewidaabaan+Pej+VocPl: ishkodewidaabaanish***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 7
     ishkodewidaabaan+Pej+Obv: ishkodewidaabaanishan
     ishkodewidaabaan+Pej+Pl: ishkodewidaabaanishag
     ishkodewidaabaan+Pej+Loc: ishkodewidaabaanishing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 5, 6
     ishkodewidaabaan+Pos1Pl+Pret: ishkodewidaabaaninaaniban
     ishkodewidaabaan+Pos1Pl+VocPl: ishkodewidaabaaninaan***idig, idog***
     ishkodewidaabaan+PosPl+Pret: ishkodewidaabaaniwaaiban
     ishkodewidaabaan+PosPl+VocPl: ishkodewidaabaaniwaa***idig, idog***
     ishkodewidaabaan+PosObv+Pret: ishkodewidaabaaniniiban
     ishkodewidaabaan+PosObv+VocPl: ishkodewidaabaanini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 5, 7
     ishkodewidaabaan+Pos1Pl+Obv: ishkodewidaabaaninaanan
     ishkodewidaabaan+Pos1Pl+Pl: ishkodewidaabaaninaanag
     ishkodewidaabaan+Pos1Pl+Loc: ishkodewidaabaaninaaning
     ishkodewidaabaan+PosPl+Obv: ishkodewidaabaaniwaaan
     ishkodewidaabaan+PosPl+Pl: ishkodewidaabaaniwaaag
     ishkodewidaabaan+PosPl+Loc: ishkodewidaabaaniwaaing
     ishkodewidaabaan+PosObv+Obv: ishkodewidaabaaninian
     ishkodewidaabaan+PosObv+Pl: ishkodewidaabaaniniag
     ishkodewidaabaan+PosObv+Loc: ishkodewidaabaaniniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6, 7
     ishkodewidaabaan+Pret+Obv: ishkodewidaabaanibanan
     ishkodewidaabaan+Pret+Pl: ishkodewidaabaanibanag
     ishkodewidaabaan+Pret+Loc: ishkodewidaabaanibaning
     ishkodewidaabaan+VocPl+Obv: ishkodewidaabaan***idig, idog***an
     ishkodewidaabaan+VocPl+Pl: ishkodewidaabaan***idig, idog***ag
     ishkodewidaabaan+VocPl+Loc: ishkodewidaabaan***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3
     +Px1ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos: niishkodewidaabaanensim
     +Px1ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos: niishkodewidaabaanenhim
     +Px2ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos: giishkodewidaabaanensim
     +Px2ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos: giishkodewidaabaanenhim
     +Px3ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos: oishkodewidaabaanensim
     +Px3ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos: oishkodewidaabaanenhim
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos: iishkodewidaabaanensim
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos: iishkodewidaabaanenhim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4
     +Px1ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pej: niishkodewidaabaanensish
     +Px1ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pej: niishkodewidaabaanenhish
     +Px2ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pej: giishkodewidaabaanensish
     +Px2ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pej: giishkodewidaabaanenhish
     +Px3ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pej: oishkodewidaabaanensish
     +Px3ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pej: oishkodewidaabaanenhish
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pej: iishkodewidaabaanensish
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pej: iishkodewidaabaanenhish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5
     +Px1ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos1Pl: niishkodewidaabaanensinaan
     +Px1ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+PosPl: niishkodewidaabaanensiwaa
     +Px1ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+PosObv: niishkodewidaabaanensini
     +Px1ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos1Pl: niishkodewidaabaanenhinaan
     +Px1ishkodewidaabaan+Con+PosPl: niishkodewidaabaanenhiwaa
     +Px1ishkodewidaabaan+Con+PosObv: niishkodewidaabaanenhini
     +Px2ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos1Pl: giishkodewidaabaanensinaan
     +Px2ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+PosPl: giishkodewidaabaanensiwaa
     +Px2ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+PosObv: giishkodewidaabaanensini
     +Px2ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos1Pl: giishkodewidaabaanenhinaan
     +Px2ishkodewidaabaan+Con+PosPl: giishkodewidaabaanenhiwaa
     +Px2ishkodewidaabaan+Con+PosObv: giishkodewidaabaanenhini
     +Px3ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos1Pl: oishkodewidaabaanensinaan
     +Px3ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+PosPl: oishkodewidaabaanensiwaa
     +Px3ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+PosObv: oishkodewidaabaanensini
     +Px3ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos1Pl: oishkodewidaabaanenhinaan
     +Px3ishkodewidaabaan+Con+PosPl: oishkodewidaabaanenhiwaa
     +Px3ishkodewidaabaan+Con+PosObv: oishkodewidaabaanenhini
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos1Pl: iishkodewidaabaanensinaan
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+Dim+PosPl: iishkodewidaabaanensiwaa
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+Dim+PosObv: iishkodewidaabaanensini
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos1Pl: iishkodewidaabaanenhinaan
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+Con+PosPl: iishkodewidaabaanenhiwaa
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+Con+PosObv: iishkodewidaabaanenhini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 6
     +Px1ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pret: niishkodewidaabaanensiban
     +Px1ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+VocPl: niishkodewidaabaanens***idig, idog***
     +Px1ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pret: niishkodewidaabaanenhiban
     +Px1ishkodewidaabaan+Con+VocPl: niishkodewidaabaanenh***idig, idog***
     +Px2ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pret: giishkodewidaabaanensiban
     +Px2ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+VocPl: giishkodewidaabaanens***idig, idog***
     +Px2ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pret: giishkodewidaabaanenhiban
     +Px2ishkodewidaabaan+Con+VocPl: giishkodewidaabaanenh***idig, idog***
     +Px3ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pret: oishkodewidaabaanensiban
     +Px3ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+VocPl: oishkodewidaabaanens***idig, idog***
     +Px3ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pret: oishkodewidaabaanenhiban
     +Px3ishkodewidaabaan+Con+VocPl: oishkodewidaabaanenh***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pret: iishkodewidaabaanensiban
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+Dim+VocPl: iishkodewidaabaanens***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pret: iishkodewidaabaanenhiban
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+Con+VocPl: iishkodewidaabaanenh***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 7
